Utah statutes.
70A-7a-702.   Savings clause.

A document of title issued or a bailment that arises before May 1, 2006 and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing from that document or bailment are governed by any statute or other rule amended or repealed by this chapter as if amendment or repeal had not occurred and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute or other rule.

